morph-phon.xfst
define DelPV %^pA -> a , %^pI -> ı, %^pO -> o, %^pU -> u , 
             %^pÂ -> â , %^pÎ -> î, %^pÔ -> ô, %^pÛ -> û;

define VowelHarmony [ %^I -> ı  //  Vbu          \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> u  //  Vbr          \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> ü  //  [Vfr | %^pO | %^pU] \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> i  //  [Vfu | %^pA | %^pI] \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> a  //  Vb           \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> e  //  [Vf | Vpal]  \Vall* _  ]
               .o. [ %^A -> e , %^I -> i ] ! defaults
               .o. DelPV;

!
! Final stop devoicing
!
!
! NOTE: reduplication should be done after this one.
!

define FSDevoicing  [%^c -> c,
                     %^g -> ğ,
#if (ALLOW_mAG == 1)
                     %^K (->) ğ,
#endif
                     %^K -> y,
                     %^p -> b,
                     %^t -> d ||    _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]  ]
                .o.  %^k -> ğ || \n _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]
                .o.  %^k -> g || n  _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]
                .o. [%^c -> ç,
                     %^g -> g,
                     %^K -> k,
                     %^p -> p,
                     %^t -> t,
                     %^k -> k];

!
! Voicing assimilation
!

#if (RELAXED_D_ASSIMILATION == 1)
define VoicingAssimilation  [ %^D (->) t , 
#else
define VoicingAssimilation  [ %^D -> t , 
#endif
#if (RELAXED_C_ASSIMILATION == 1)
                              %^C (->) ç,
#else
                              %^C -> ç,
#endif
                              %^G -> k  
                             || ConsUV [ IntSym | AposSym]* _ ]
                       .o.  [ %^D -> d,
                              %^C -> c,
                              %^G -> g ];

!
! Reduplication of some root final consonants (gemination)
!         hak -> hakkı



define RedupGen     %@DUP%@ -> %@DUPL || _ Cons IntSym* Vall
                .o. [..] -> %@DUPR || %@DUPL ? _ 
                .o. [..] -> %@DUPL Cons %@DUPR || %@DUPL ? %@DUPR _ ;

define Redup _eq(RedupGen, %@DUPL, %@DUPR)
         .o. %@DUP%@ | %@DUPL | %@DUPR -> 0;

!
! Delete silent phonemes
!

define DeleteSilentP [ Vsilent | ConsSilent ] -> 0;

!
! ki -> kü
!
! the suffix ki may be realized as kü if the preceding vowel is `ü'
! this seems to be mostly optional with varying degree of preference
! over one or the other  based on the root form. For example, it is
! more likely to hear 'dünkü' but 'gülünki'.

define KiKu i (->)  ü || ü [\Vall]* Boundary k _ %@MB ;


!
! m-reduplication
!
! This, in fact, is not reduplication in morphology, but reduplication
! of words with a phonetic alternation. In a nutshell: replicated words
! follow the original word, but the first letter/phoneme is replaced
! with 'm' if the original word starts with a consonant, or an 'm' is
! prepended to the original word if it starts with a vowel.
!
! For example, 'gözü mözü (şişmiş)', 'arabası marabası varmış'
!

define Mredup [..] -> m    || .#. _ [Vall] ?* %@MREDUP
          .o. [Cons] ->  m  || .#. _ ?+ %@MREDUP;

define DeleteMredup  %@MREDUP -> 0;

!
! Filter for cleaning up the intermediate symbols in the analysis level
! we also deal with adding -sI to compound noun roots, since we use a
! special notation in lexicon and leave the -(s)I out in lexical entries.
! 
!

#if (PERCENT_AS_PREFIX == 0)
!
! move the prefix percent after the number.
! this feels more readable witho right-arrow rules.
! we'll use the inverse of it
!
define percfilter [ [..] -> {<perc>} || .#. 
                                      {<perc>}  
                                      [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%.|%,]+
                                      {<Num} \">"* %> _ ]
                  .o. {<perc>} -> 0 || .#. _ ;
#endif

#if (SEPARATOR_PLUS == 1)
define plussep %< -> %+ // _ \%>+ %> 
#if (MARK_SUBCATEGORIES == 0)
           .o. %: -> %+ // %+ \%>+ _ \%>+ %>
#endif
           .o. %> -> 0  // %+ \[%+|%>]+ _ ;
#elif (MARK_SUBCATEGORIES == 0)
define subcatfeature %: -> %>%<  // %< [\[%>|%:]]+ _ ?+ %>;
#endif

define AFilter    FSDevoicing.i 
              .o. VowelHarmony.i 
              .o. DeleteBuffer.i
#if (SEPARATOR_PLUS == 1)
              .o. plussep.i
#elif (MARK_SUBCATEGORIES == 0)
              .o. subcatfeature.i
#endif
              .o. %^%(s%) %^I  <- %@NCOMP
              .o. 0 <- %@DEL%@ 
              .o. 0 <- %@DELS%@ 
              .o. 0 <- %@DUP%@
              .o. 0 <- ˈ
              .o. 0 <- %@dB
              .o. 0 <- (ConsSilent|Vsilent)
#if (PERCENT_AS_PREFIX == 0)
              .o. percfilter.i
#endif
            ! Disallow derivational suffix -sI with stems ending with a vowel
              .o. ~[?*] <- Vall {<N><si>} 
              ;

! A few analysis symbols may result from different surface forms.
! In the morphological description, we keep theme saparate so that
! they can be distinguished when needed. However, we do not want them
! as different symbols in normal analysis strings, so we collapse them
! here.
! 
define collapseAsymbols %: %0          -> 0 || %< p 3 p _ %> 
                    .o. %: s I n l A r -> 0 || %< 3 p _ %>
                    .o. %: s I n       -> 0 || %< 3 p _ %>
                    .o. %: %0          -> 0 || %< 3 p _ %>
                    .o. %: %0          -> 0 || %< 3 s _ %>
                    .o. %: s A n A     -> 0 || %< 2 s _ %>
                    .o. %: y I n       -> 0 || %< 2 s _ %>
                    .o. %: y I n       -> 0 || %< 2 p _ %>
                    .o. %: y I n I z   -> 0 || %< 2 p _ %>
                    .o. %: s A n I z   -> 0 || %< 2 p _ %>
#if (COLLAPSE_MA_MAK == 1)
                    .o. m A (K)        -> 0 || %< v n %: i n f _ %>
#endif
                    .o. %: z           -> 0 || %< c v %: d e n _ %>
                    .o. %: c I k       -> 0 || %< d i m _ %>
                    .o. %: c A k       -> 0 || %< d i m _ %>
                    .o. %: I c A k     -> 0 || %< d i m _ %>
                    .o. %: A c A k     -> 0 || %< d i m _ %>
                    .o. %: c A g I z   -> 0 || %< d i m _ %>
                    ;

define DeleteBoundary ["@MB" | "@RB"] -> 0 ;

!
! Delete Circumflex
!
! The vowels with circumflex î, û, â are written without circumflex
! most of the time. We optionally delete the accent from the surface.

define DeleteCircumflex î (->) i, Î (->) İ, 
                        û (->) u, Û (->) U, 
                        â (->) a, Â (->) A;

!
! Add Circumflex
!
! Current spelling rules state that circumflex is used only when a
! word is ambiguous without circumflex, e.g., 'hala' and 'hâlâ'.
! However most older text include circumflexed vowels that would not
! be recognized by a lexicon according to the new rules. 
! 
! This simply allows free replacement of non-circumflexed versions of
! the vowels with circumflexed versions in the surface. This should
! have little impact on analysis since people rarely insert these
! accents by mistake, but this would certainly cause overblown 
! generation with lots of incorrect words.
!

define AddCircumflex  DeleteCircumflex.i;

!
! Allow capitalization, normally this should happen only at the
! beginning of a sentence.
!
!

define Capitalize a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, ç (->) Ç, d (->) D, 
        e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G, ğ (->) Ğ, h (->) H, ı (->) I, i (->) İ, 
        j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, ö (->) Ö, 
        p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, ş (->) Ş, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü, 
        v (->) V, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, î (->) Î, û (->) Û, â (->) Â || .#. _ ;

!
! Accept All-capitals text. For this to work properly, it should be
! composed with Capitalize above.
!
! Second bit makes sure that once we start capitalizing the word, we
! go all the way  to the end. No half capitalization.
!
define CAP [A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â];
define AllCaps a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, ç (->) Ç, d (->) D, 
        e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G, ğ (->) Ğ, h (->) H, ı (->) I, i (->) İ, 
        j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, ö (->) Ö, 
        p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, ş (->) Ş, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü, 
        v (->) V, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, î (->) Î, û (->) Û, â (->) Â 
        // (AposSym) CAP (AposSym) _ 
    .o. a -> A, b -> B, c -> C, ç -> Ç, d -> D, 
        e -> E, f -> F, g -> G, ğ -> Ğ, h -> H, ı -> I, i -> İ, 
        j -> J, k -> K, l -> L, m -> M, n -> N, o -> O, ö -> Ö, 
        p -> P, r -> R, s -> S, ş -> Ş, t -> T, u -> U, ü -> Ü, 
        v -> V, y -> Y, z -> Z, î -> Î, û -> Û, â -> Â 
        // CAP (AposSym) CAP _;

!
! Accept text written in all or partial ASCII. This is common in
! online communication, especially when people use non TR keyboards.
! 

define AllASCII      ç (->) c, Ç (->) Ç,
                     ğ (->) g, Ğ (->) G,
                     ı (->) i, İ (->) I,
                     ö (->) o, Ö (->) O,
                     ş (->) s, Ş (->) S,
                     ü (->) u, Ü (->) U,
                     î (->) i, Î (->) I,
                     û (->) u, Û (->) U,
                     â (->) a, Â (->) A;
